Hawaii statutes.
§667-74
Availability of dispute resolution required before foreclosure. Before a public sale may be conducted pursuant to section 667-25
for a residential property that is occupied by an owner-occupant, the
foreclosing mortgagee, at the election of the owner-occupant,
shall participate in the mortgage foreclosure dispute resolution program under this part to attempt to negotiate
an agreement that avoids foreclosure or mitigates damages in cases where
foreclosure is unavoidable. [L 2011, c 48, pt of §1, §45(2); am L 2012, c 182, §§38, 49]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next